Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Medical Assistance (State Medicaid Program)
205.560.
Scope of care to be designated by administrative regulations — Reimbursements mandated or prohibited — Assessment of health care provider credentials — Participation of providers in Medical Assistance Program.

The scope of medical care for which the Cabinet for Health and Family Services undertakes to pay shall be designated and limited by regulations promulgated by the cabinet, pursuant to the provisions in this section. Within the limitations of any appropriation therefor, the provision of complete upper and lower dentures to recipients of Medical Assistance Program benefits who have their teeth removed by a dentist resulting in the total absence of teeth shall be a mandatory class in the scope of medical care. Payment to a dentist of any Medical Assistance Program benefits for complete upper and lower dentures shall only be provided on the condition of a preauthorized agreement between an authorized representative of the Medical Assistance Program and the dentist prior to the removal of the teeth. The selection of another class or other classes of medical care shall be recommended by the council to the secretary for health and family services after taking into consideration, among other things, the amount of federal and state funds available, the most essential needs of recipients, and the meeting of such need on a basis insuring the greatest amount of medical care as defined in KRS 205.510 consonant with the funds available, including but not limited to the following categories, except where the aid is for the purpose of obtaining an abortion:

Hospital care, including drugs, and medical supplies and services during any period of actual hospitalization;

Nursing-home care, including medical supplies and services, and drugs during confinement therein on prescription of a physician, dentist, or podiatrist;

Drugs, nursing care, medical supplies, and services during the time when a recipient is not in a hospital but is under treatment and on the prescription of a physician, dentist, or podiatrist. For purposes of this paragraph, drugs shall include products for the treatment of inborn errors of metabolism or genetic, gastrointestinal, and food allergic conditions, consisting of therapeutic food, formulas, supplements, amino acid-based elemental formula, or low-protein modified food products that are medically indicated for therapeutic treatment and are administered under the direction of a physician, and include but are not limited to the following conditions:

Phenylketonuria;

Hyperphenylalaninemia;

Tyrosinemia (types I, II, and III);

Maple syrup urine disease;

A-ketoacid dehydrogenase deficiency;

Isovaleryl-CoA dehydrogenase deficiency;

3-methylcrotonyl-CoA carboxylase deficiency;

3-methylglutaconyl-CoA hydratase deficiency;

3-hydroxy-3-methylglutaryl-CoA lyase deficiency (HMG-CoA lyase deficiency);

B-ketothiolase deficiency;

Homocystinuria;

Glutaric aciduria (types I and II);

Lysinuric protein intolerance;

Non-ketotic hyperglycinemia;

Propionic acidemia;

Gyrate atrophy;

Hyperornithinemia/hyperammonemia/homocitrullinuria syndrome;

Carbamoyl phosphate synthetase deficiency;

Ornithine carbamoyl transferase deficiency;

Citrullinemia;

Arginosuccinic aciduria;

Methylmalonic acidemia;

Argininemia;

Food protein allergies;

Food protein-induced enterocolitis syndrome;

Eosinophilic disorders; and

Short bowel syndrome;

Physician, podiatric, and dental services;

Optometric services for all age groups shall be limited to prescription services, services to frames and lenses, and diagnostic services provided by an optometrist, to the extent the optometrist is licensed to perform the services and to the extent the services are covered in the ophthalmologist portion of the physician’s program. Eyeglasses shall be provided only to children under age twenty-one (21);

Drugs on the prescription of a physician used to prevent the rejection of transplanted organs if the patient is indigent; and

Nonprofit neighborhood health organizations or clinics where some or all of the medical services are provided by licensed registered nurses or by advanced medical students presently enrolled in a medical school accredited by the Association of American Medical Colleges and where the students or licensed registered nurses are under the direct supervision of a licensed physician who rotates his services in this supervisory capacity between two (2) or more of the nonprofit neighborhood health organizations or clinics specified in this paragraph.

Payments for hospital care, nursing-home care, and drugs or other medical, ophthalmic, podiatric, and dental supplies shall be on bases which relate the amount of the payment to the cost of providing the services or supplies. It shall be one (1) of the functions of the council to make recommendations to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services with respect to the bases for payment. In determining the rates of reimbursement for long-term-care facilities participating in the Medical Assistance Program, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall, to the extent permitted by federal law, not allow the following items to be considered as a cost to the facility for purposes of reimbursement:

Motor vehicles that are not owned by the facility, including motor vehicles that are registered or owned by the facility but used primarily by the owner or family members thereof;

The cost of motor vehicles, including vans or trucks, used for facility business shall be allowed up to fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per facility, adjusted annually for inflation according to the increase in the consumer price index-u for the most recent twelve (12) month period, as determined by the United States Department of Labor. Medically equipped motor vehicles, vans, or trucks shall be exempt from the fifteen thousand dollar ($15,000) limitation. Costs exceeding this limit shall not be reimbursable and shall be borne by the facility. Costs for additional motor vehicles, not to exceed a total of three (3) per facility, may be approved by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services if the facility demonstrates that each additional vehicle is necessary for the operation of the facility as required by regulations of the cabinet;

Salaries paid to immediate family members of the owner or administrator, or both, of a facility, to the extent that services are not actually performed and are not a necessary function as required by regulation of the cabinet for the operation of the facility. The facility shall keep a record of all work actually performed by family members;

The cost of contracts, loans, or other payments made by the facility to owners, administrators, or both, unless the payments are for services which would otherwise be necessary to the operation of the facility and the services are required by regulations of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. Any other payments shall be deemed part of the owner’s compensation in accordance with maximum limits established by regulations of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. Interest paid to the facility for loans made to a third party may be used to offset allowable interest claimed by the facility;

Private club memberships for owners or administrators, travel expenses for trips outside the state for owners or administrators, and other indirect payments made to the owner, unless the payments are deemed part of the owner’s compensation in accordance with maximum limits established by regulations of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and

Payments made to related organizations supplying the facility with goods or services shall be limited to the actual cost of the goods or services to the related organization, unless it can be demonstrated that no relationship between the facility and the supplier exists. A relationship shall be considered to exist when an individual, including brothers, sisters, father, mother, aunts, uncles, and in-laws, possesses a total of five percent (5%) or more of ownership equity in the facility and the supplying business. An exception to the relationship shall exist if fifty-one percent (51%) or more of the supplier’s business activity of the type carried on with the facility is transacted with persons and organizations other than the facility and its related organizations.

No vendor payment shall be made unless the class and type of medical care rendered and the cost basis therefor has first been designated by regulation.

The rules and regulations of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall require that a written statement, including the required opinion of a physician, shall accompany any claim for reimbursement for induced premature births. This statement shall indicate the procedures used in providing the medical services.

The range of medical care benefit standards provided and the quality and quantity standards and the methods for determining cost formulae for vendor payments within each category of public assistance and other recipients shall be uniform for the entire state, and shall be designated by regulation promulgated within the limitations established by the Social Security Act and federal regulations. It shall not be necessary that the amount of payments for units of services be uniform for the entire state but amounts may vary from county to county and from city to city, as well as among hospitals, based on the prevailing cost of medical care in each locale and other local economic and geographic conditions, except that insofar as allowed by applicable federal law and regulation, the maximum amounts reimbursable for similar services rendered by physicians within the same specialty of medical practice shall not vary according to the physician’s place of residence or place of practice, as long as the place of practice is within the boundaries of the state.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to deprive a woman of all appropriate medical care necessary to prevent her physical death.

To the extent permitted by federal law, no medical assistance recipient shall be recertified as qualifying for a level of long-term care below the recipient’s current level, unless the recertification includes a physical examination conducted by a physician licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 311 or by an advanced practice registered nurse licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 314 and acting under the physician’s supervision.

If payments made to community mental health centers, established pursuant to KRS Chapter 210, for services provided to the intellectually disabled exceed the actual cost of providing the service, the balance of the payments shall be used solely for the provision of other services to the intellectually disabled through community mental health centers.

No long-term-care facility, as defined in KRS 216.510, providing inpatient care to recipients of medical assistance under Title XIX of the Social Security Act on July 15, 1986, shall deny admission of a person to a bed certified for reimbursement under the provisions of the Medical Assistance Program solely on the basis of the person’s paying status as a Medicaid recipient. No person shall be removed or discharged from any facility solely because they became eligible for participation in the Medical Assistance Program, unless the facility can demonstrate the resident or the resident’s responsible party was fully notified in writing that the resident was being admitted to a bed not certified for Medicaid reimbursement. No facility may decertify a bed occupied by a Medicaid recipient or may decertify a bed that is occupied by a resident who has made application for medical assistance.

Family-practice physicians practicing in geographic areas with no more than one (1) primary-care physician per five thousand (5,000) population, as reported by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, shall be reimbursed one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the standard reimbursement rate for physician services.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall make payments under the Medical Assistance program for services which are within the lawful scope of practice of a chiropractor licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 312, to the extent the Medical Assistance Program pays for the same services provided by a physician.

The Medical Assistance Program shall use the appropriate form and guidelines for enrolling those providers applying for participation in the Medical Assistance Program, including those licensed and regulated under KRS Chapters 311, 312, 314, 315, and 320, any facility required to be licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 216B, and any other health care practitioner or facility as determined by the Department for Medicaid Services through an administrative regulation promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A. A Medicaid managed care organization shall use the forms and guidelines established under KRS 304.17A-545(5) to credential a provider. For any provider who contracts with and is credentialed by a Medicaid managed care organization prior to enrollment, the cabinet shall complete the enrollment process and deny, or approve and issue a Provider Identification Number (PID) within fifteen (15) business days from the time all necessary completed enrollment forms have been submitted and all outstanding accounts receivable have been satisfied.
(12) (a)

The Medical Assistance Program shall use the appropriate form and guidelines for enrolling those providers applying for participation in the Medical Assistance Program, including those licensed and regulated under KRS Chapters 311, 312, 314, 315, and 320, any facility required to be licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 216B, and any other health care practitioner or facility as determined by the Department for Medicaid Services through an administrative regulation promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A. A Medicaid managed care organization shall use the forms and guidelines established under KRS 304.17A-545(5) to credential a provider. For any provider who contracts with and is credentialed by a Medicaid managed care organization prior to enrollment, the cabinet shall complete the enrollment process and deny, or approve and issue a Provider Identification Number (PID) within fifteen (15) business days from the time all necessary completed enrollment forms have been submitted and all outstanding accounts receivable have been satisfied.

Within forty-five (45) days of receiving a correct and complete provider application, the Department for Medicaid Services shall complete the enrollment process by either denying or approving and issuing a Provider Identification Number (PID) for a behavioral health provider who provides substance use disorder services, unless the department notifies the provider that additional time is needed to render a decision for resolution of an issue or dispute.

Within forty-five (45) days of receipt of a correct and complete application for credentialing by a behavioral health provider providing substance use disorder services, a Medicaid managed care organization shall complete its contracting and credentialing process, unless the Medicaid managed care organization notifies the provider that additional time is needed to render a decision. If additional time is needed, the Medicaid managed care organization shall not take any longer than ninety (90) days from receipt of the credentialing application to deny or approve and contract with the provider.

A Medicaid managed care organization shall adjudicate any clean claims submitted for a substance use disorder service from an enrolled and credentialed behavioral health provider who provides substance use disorder services in accordance with KRS 304.17A-700 to 304.17A-730.

The Department of Insurance may impose a civil penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) per violation when a Medicaid managed care organization fails to comply with this section. Each day that a Medicaid managed care organization fails to pay a claim may count as a separate violation.

Dentists licensed under KRS Chapter 313 shall be excluded from the requirements of subsection (12) of this section. The Department for Medicaid Services shall develop a specific form and establish guidelines for assessing the credentials of dentists applying for participation in the Medical Assistance Program.

History.
Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VII, § 7; 1960 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 3; 1970, ch. 78, § 3; 1972, ch. 256, § 16; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, §§ 50, 107(1), (14), (15), (19); 1974, ch. 225, § 3; 1976, ch. 141, § 1; 1978, ch. 99, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 140, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 29, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 315, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 133, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 248, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 306, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 310, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 466, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 482, § 8, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 304, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 199, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 290, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 457, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 234, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 144, § 4, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 34, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2007, ch. 90, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 119, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2010, ch. 85, § 34, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 141, § 12, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 118, § 8, effective April 4, 2013; 2015 ch. 66, § 4, effective March 25, 2015; 2016 ch. 10, § 1, effective April 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 112, § 7, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 143, § 17, § 17, effective July 14, 2018.

205.5601.
Cabinet’s reimbursement for qualifying ground ambulance service transports.

Upon approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the assessment imposed under KRS 142.318 for fee-for-service rates effective on or after July 1, 2020, the cabinet shall reimburse each ground ambulance provider that provided qualifying ground ambulance service transports during the relevant assessment period an amount not to exceed the emergency medical services ambulance rates adopted by the cabinet.

HISTORY:
2020 ch. 110, § 4, effective July 15, 2020.

205.5602.
Duties of Department for Medicaid Services regarding ground ambulance service transports — Assessment amount and administration — Need for state plan or waiver amendment — Reports.

For purposes of this section and KRS 205.5601 and 205.5603:

“Ground ambulance provider” means a Class I, II, or III ground ambulance provider described in KRS 311A.030;

“Assessment” means the Medicaid ambulance service provider assessment imposed in KRS 142.318;

“Board” means the Kentucky Board of Emergency Medical Services;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department for Medicaid Services; and

“Department” means the Department for Medicaid Services.

The department shall:

Promulgate administrative regulations to establish the standards and procedures necessary to implement the provisions of this section and KRS 205.5601 and 205.5603;

Calculate an assessment on emergency ground transport collections pursuant to subsection (3) of this section;

Administer assessment proceeds according to subsection (6) of this section;

Apply uniformly to all assessed ground ambulance providers any annual changes to the assessment rate according to the process described in subsection (3) of this section; and

Evaluate current ground ambulance provider reimbursement rates paid by managed care organizations and require increases consistent with:

KRS 205.5601 and this section;

Current fee-for-service reimbursement rates; and

An adequate network of ambulance service providers.

The assessment due from a ground ambulance provider on emergency ground transport collections shall be not less than one-half of one percent (0.5%) lower than the maximum limit for a provider assessment as approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(3) (a)

The assessment due from a ground ambulance provider on emergency ground transport collections shall be not less than one-half of one percent (0.5%) lower than the maximum limit for a provider assessment as approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

For illustrative purposes only, if the maximum limit for a provider assessment as approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services is six percent (6%) of the emergency revenues collected by the ground ambulance provider, the minimum taxable limit under this section would be five and one-half percent (5.5%) of the emergency revenues collected.

The assessment shall not generate more than the maximum amount as approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

Within ninety (90) days after July 15, 2020, the commissioner shall determine whether a state plan amendment or an amendment to any Kentucky federal Medicaid waiver is required to implement this section.
(5) (a) 1.

Within ninety (90) days after July 15, 2020, the commissioner shall determine whether a state plan amendment or an amendment to any Kentucky federal Medicaid waiver is required to implement this section.

If the commissioner determines that a state plan amendment or an amendment to a Kentucky federal waiver is necessary, the commissioner is authorized to seek any necessary state plan or waiver amendment, and the assessment shall not take effect until the state plan or waiver amendment is approved.

The assessment shall not be implemented until the first day of the calendar quarter after the Department for Medicaid Services receives notice of federal matching funds approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and has notified the Department of Revenue of that approval.

The commissioner shall implement this section to the extent that it is not inconsistent with the state Medicaid plan or any Kentucky federal Medicaid waivers.

Payments to ground ambulance providers shall begin within ninety (90) days of the later of the approval of federal matching funds, the state plan, or waiver amendment. The first monthly assessment payment shall be due sixty (60) days after the implementation of the enhanced fee schedule.

The assessment shall be administered as follows:

An annual amount of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) shall be returned to the department to offset the Medicaid administration expenses;

The remaining portion of the assessment shall:

Be utilized to increase the rates paid by a managed care organization for emergency ambulance services up to the amount paid by the fee-for-service Medicaid program for emergency ambulance services; or

Be paid as supplemental payments to ground ambulance providers in a proportional amount according to the total Medicaid ambulance transports; and

If any funds are remaining after the department’s duties have been completed under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the remaining funds shall be utilized by the department to increase non-emergency medical transport rates.

Each ground ambulance provider shall report to the board, at the time and in the manner required by the board, ground emergency revenue collected to accomplish the purposes of this section and KRS 205.5603.

No more than one hundred eighty (180) days after the end of each calendar year, the board shall submit to the cabinet transport data for all ground ambulance providers licensed in Kentucky.
(8) (a)

No more than one hundred eighty (180) days after the end of each calendar year, the board shall submit to the cabinet transport data for all ground ambulance providers licensed in Kentucky.

The data required by paragraph (a) of this subsection shall, at a minimum, include the number of emergency ground transports completed during the previous calendar year and the emergency revenue collected.

HISTORY:
2020 ch. 110, § 5, effective July 15, 2020.

205.5603.
Ambulance service assessment fund — Appropriation and transfer of fund moneys — Sole purposes of fund — Effect of invalidity of KRS 205.5602.

There is established in the State Treasury the ambulance service assessment fund for the purpose of depositing assessments imposed under KRS 142.318.

The fund shall consist of the assessments and any related penalties collected by the Department of Revenue, donations made to the fund from private sources, and appropriations made by the General Assembly.

Moneys deposited into the fund are appropriated for the purpose of administering KRS 205.5602 and shall be transferred to the Department for Medicaid Services on a monthly basis for that purpose.

Moneys in the fund shall not be diverted to the general fund or any other public fund. Moneys in the fund may only be used to:

Increase fee-for-service rates for ground ambulance services above those in effect on July 15, 2020;

Reimburse money to a ground ambulance provider that is erroneously collected from that provider; or

Reimburse the cabinet in the amount of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) annually for the purpose of administrative expenses.

If KRS 205.5602 is rendered invalid and void:

To the extent that federal matching funds are not reduced due to the impermissibility of the assessments, the cabinet shall disburse the moneys remaining in the fund that were derived from the assessment imposed by KRS 142.318 pursuant to subsection (4) of this section; and

Following disbursement of moneys in the fund pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection, the cabinet shall refund any remaining moneys to each ground ambulance provider in proportion to the amount paid by each provider during the most recently completed quarterly payment period.

Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, moneys in the fund not expended at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.

Any interest earnings of the trust fund shall become part of the fund and shall not lapse.

Moneys transferred to this fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes set forth in this section.

HISTORY:
2020 ch. 110, § 6, effective July 15, 2020.